Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 41. Automated Vehicle Testing

§ 4201.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Automated Vehicle Testing Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 60

, § 16.

§ 4202.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Automated driving system” means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis within its operational design domain, if any, including achieving a minimal risk condition, without any intervention or supervision by a conventional human driver, where applicable.

“Automated vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system.

“Automated vehicle tester” or “tester” means an individual, company, public agency, or other organization that is testing automated vehicles on public highways in this State pursuant to this chapter including an automated vehicle manufacturer, municipal or State agency, institution of higher education, fleet service provider, or automotive equipment or technology provider.

“Conventional human driver” means an individual who manually engages in-vehicle braking, accelerating, steering, and transmission gear selection input devices in order to operate a vehicle.

“Dynamic driving task” means all the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic within its specific operational design domain, if any, excluding the strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints.

“Highly automated vehicle” means a vehicle equipped with an automated driving system capable of performing all aspects of the dynamic driving task within its operational design domain, if any, including achieving a minimal risk condition, without any intervention or supervision by a conventional human driver.

“Manufacturer” means an individual or company that designs, produces, or constructs vehicles or equipment. Manufacturers include original equipment manufacturers (OEMs), multiple and final stage manufacturers, individuals or companies making changes to a completed vehicle before first retail sale or deployment (upfitters), and modifiers (individuals or companies making changes to existing vehicles after first retail sale or deployment).

“Minimal risk condition” means a condition in which an automated vehicle operating without a human driver, upon experiencing a failure of its automated driving system that renders the automated vehicle unable to perform the dynamic driving task, achieves a reasonably safe state that may include bringing the automated vehicle to a complete stop.

“Operational design domain” means a description of the specific domain or domains in which an automated driving system is designed to properly operate, including types of roadways, ranges of speed, weather, time of day, and environmental conditions.

“Operator” means an individual employed by or under contract with an automated vehicle tester who has successfully completed the tester’s training on safe driving and the capabilities and limitations of the automated vehicle and automated driving system, can take immediate manual or remote control of the automated vehicle being tested, is 21 years of age or older, and holds an operator’s license for the class of vehicle being tested.

“Public highway” means a State or municipal highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(12)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 60

, § 16.

§ 4203.
Testing of automated vehicles on public highways.

An automated vehicle shall not be operated on public highways for testing until the Traffic Committee as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(24)

approves a permit application for automated vehicle testers that defines the scope and operational design domain for the test and demonstrates the ability of the automated vehicle tester to comply with the requirements of this section.

Prior to approving a permit application, the Traffic Committee shall conduct a hearing to provide for comments from the public. Legislative bodies of the municipalities where an automated vehicle will be tested shall be notified by the Traffic Committee 60 calendar days prior to the Traffic Committee hearing when the geographic scope of the test includes State highways or Class 1, 2, 3, or 4 town highways, as classified pursuant to

19 V.S.A. § 302

, within the geographic boundaries of the municipality.

The Traffic Committee is authorized to approve the testing of automated vehicles on:

All State highways and Class 1 town highways.

Class 2, 3, and 4 town highways within the geographic boundaries of municipalities that have preapproved testing of automated vehicles on Class 2, 3, and 4 town highways within the geographic boundaries of the municipality as of the date the permit application for automated vehicle testing is filed. A municipality may immediately revoke its preapproval of automated vehicle testing by notifying the Secretary of Transportation in writing that it no longer wishes to allow testing of automated vehicles on Class 2, 3, and 4 town highways within the geographic boundaries of the municipality.

The Agency of Transportation’s Automated Vehicle Testing Guide shall include a list of municipalities that have preapproved testing of automated vehicles and shall update the Automated Vehicle Testing Guide within 10 business days after a municipality notifies the Secretary of Transportation in writing that it now wishes to allow testing of automated vehicles on Class 2, 3, and 4 town highways within the geographic boundaries of the municipality or no longer wishes to allow testing of automated vehicles on Class 2, 3, and 4 town highways within the geographic boundaries of the municipality.

The Traffic Committee has the sole authority to approve specific test permit applications. Municipal approval of specific testing permits is not required. Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(2) of this section, after a test permit has been approved by the Traffic Committee, all modifications to the operational design domain or other permit conditions, including changes affecting town highways in a preapproved testing municipality, requires approval by the Traffic Committee.

Before a test commences, the Traffic Committee shall make approved automated vehicle test permits readily available to law enforcement and municipalities within the geographic scope of the operational design domain designated in the permit.

The automated vehicle tester shall submit a report to the Traffic Committee annually, until all testing ceases, summarizing results and observations related to safety, traffic operations, interaction with roadway infrastructure, comments from the public, and any other relevant matters.

An automated vehicle tester shall not test an automated vehicle on a public highway unless:

The operator is:

seated in the driver’s seat of the automated vehicle;

monitoring the operation of the automated vehicle; and

capable of taking immediate manual control of such automated vehicle.

The automated vehicle tester:

registers each automated vehicle to be tested with the Commissioner pursuant to chapter 7 of this title;

submits to the Commissioner, in a manner and form directed by the Commissioner, proof of liability insurance, self-insurance, or a surety bond of at least five million dollars for damages by reason of bodily injury, death, or property damage caused by an automated vehicle while engaged in automated vehicle testing;

has established and enforces a zero-tolerance policy for drug and alcohol use by operators while engaged in automated vehicle testing. The policy shall include provisions for investigations of alleged policy violations and the suspension of drivers under investigation; and

has conducted background checks for all operators pursuant to section 751 of this title, which may be inspected by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee pursuant to section 752 of this title.

The operator and automated vehicle tester:

comply with applicable standards established by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration regarding the testing of automated vehicles or are capable of providing proof of exemptions or waivers to such standards;

report to the Agency of Transportation and the applicable law enforcement agency within 72 hours after any motor vehicle crash involving the testing of the automated vehicle that results in personal injury or property damage; and

satisfy any other requirements and permit conditions as determined by the Traffic Committee as necessary to ensure the safe operation of such automated vehicles.

An automated vehicle testing permit may be voided and invalidated for the trip by a law enforcement officer who determines there is a violation of any condition specified in the terms of the automated vehicle test permit or that the continuation of the trip would be unsafe.

(j)

An automated vehicle testing permit may be suspended or revoked by the Traffic Committee if, after the opportunity for a hearing, the Traffic Committee determines that there is a violation of any condition or conditions specified in the terms of the automated vehicle test permit that warrants the suspension or revocation of the testing permit or that the continuation of the testing would be unsafe.

(k)

Operating or testing in violation of a suspension or revocation order shall be a traffic violation for which there shall be a penalty of not more than $1,000.00.

(
l
)

Test vehicles must be capable of operating in compliance with applicable traffic and motor vehicle laws of this State, subject to this subchapter.

(m)

An individual shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of an automated vehicle being tested on a public highway when the individual’s blood alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more.

(n)

An automated vehicle being tested on a public highway shall be clearly identifiable by the public.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 60

, § 16.